.venv/lib/python3.11/site-packages/pyphen/dictionaries/hyph_sa_IN.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 3
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 4
COMPOUNDLEFTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDRIGHTHYPHENMIN 3

% GENERAL RULE
% Do not break either side of ZERO-WIDTH JOINER  (U+200D)
2‍2
% Break after ZERO-WIDTH NON JOINER  (U+200C)
‌1
% Break before or after any independent vowel.
1अ1
1आ1
1इ1
1ई1
1उ1
1ऊ1
1ऋ1
1ॠ1
1ऌ1
1ॡ1
1ए1
1ऐ1
1ओ1
1औ1
% Break after any dependent vowel but not before.
ा1
ि1
ी1
ु1
ू1
ृ1
ॄ1
ॢ1
ॣ1
े1
ै1
ो1
ौ1
% Break before or after any consonant.
1क
1ख
1ग
1घ
1ङ
1च
1छ
1ज
1झ
1ञ
1ट
1ठ
1ड
1ढ
1ण
1त
1थ
1द
1ध
1न
1प
1फ
1ब
1भ
1म
1य
1र
1ल
1ळ
1व
1श
1ष
1स
1ह
% Do not break before chandrabindu, anusvara, visarga, avagraha
% and accents.
2ँ
2ं
2ः
2ऽ
2॑
2॒
% Do not break either side of virama (may be within conjunct).
2्2
अति1
अधि1
अन1
अनु1
अन्1
अप1
अपि1
अभि1
अव1
1इय
उद्1
उप1
1का
चिर्1
1त्र
1त्व
दुर्1
दुस्1
नि1
निर्1
निस्1
पर1
परि1
प्र1
प्रति1
1ली
1वत्
वि1
सम्1
सु1
